Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

The existing provisions of Chapter 34 were designated as Article 1 by Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB769, effective July 1, 2018.

31-34-1.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Physicians, Dentists, Physician Assistants, and Advanced Practice Registered Nurses for Rural Areas Assistance Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2017, p. 397, § 1/HB 427; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “, Dentists, Physician Assistants, and Advanced Practice Registered Nurses” in the middle of this Code section.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “This article” for “This chapter” at the beginning of this Code section.

31-34-2.
Purpose and intent of article.

It is the purpose of this article to increase the number of physicians, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses in underserved rural areas of Georgia by making loans to physicians, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses who have completed their medical or health care education and allowing such loans to be repaid by such physicians, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses agreeing to practice medicine or provide health care services in such rural areas and by making grants to hospitals and, as determined by the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce, other health care entities, local governments, and civic organizations in underserved rural areas of Georgia that agree to provide matching funds to the grant, with the intent to enhance recruitment efforts in bringing physicians, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses to such areas. It is the intent of the General Assembly that if funds are available to the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce to make loans, grants, or scholarships under this article or under other applicable state law, the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce shall give priority to loans and scholarships under Part 6 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 and to loans under Code Section 31-34-4.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 152, § 2B/HB 1178; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2011, p. 459, § 2/HB 509; Ga. L. 2017, p. 397, § 2/HB 427; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769; Ga. L. 2019, p. 224, § 2/SB 207.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the first sentence, inserted “, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses” four times, deleted “physician” preceding “underserved” twice, inserted “or health care”, and inserted “or provide health care services”.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “this article” for “this chapter” twice in this Code section.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce” for “Georgia Board for Physician Workforce” in three places.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 197 (2006).

31-34-3.
Administration by Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce.

This article shall be administered by the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce, and, as used in this article, the word “board” means the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce created in Code Section 49-10-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2011, p. 459, § 2/HB 509; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769; Ga. L. 2019, p. 224, § 2/SB 207.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “This article” for “This chapter” near the beginning and substituted “this article” for “this chapter” near the middle of this Code section.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce” for “Georgia Board for Physician Workforce” in two places.

31-34-4.
Loan applicant qualifications; rules and regulations.

A physician, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who receives a loan under the program provided for in this article shall be a citizen or national of the United States licensed to practice his or her health care profession within the State of Georgia at the time the loan is made, and shall be a graduate of an accredited graduate medical education program or other applicable accredited health care education program located in the United States which has received accreditation or provisional accreditation by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association or such other applicable accreditation for other health care education programs, as determined by the board.

The board shall make a full investigation of the qualifications of an applicant for a loan under the provisions of this article to determine the applicant’s fitness for participation in such loan program, and for such purposes, the board may propound such examinations to applicants as the board deems proper. The board’s investigation shall include a determination of the outstanding medical or health care education loans incurred by the applicant while completing his or her medical or health care education and training.

The board is authorized to consider among other criteria for granting loans under the provisions of this article the state residency status and home area of the applying physician, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse and to give priority to those applicants who are physicians, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses actively practicing or beginning active practice in specialties experiencing shortages or distribution problems in rural areas of this state as determined by the board pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by it in accordance with this article.

The board may adopt and prescribe such rules and regulations as it deems necessary or appropriate to administer and carry out the loan program provided for in this article. Such rules and regulations shall provide for fixing the rate of regular interest to accrue on loans granted under the provisions of this article. Such regular rate of interest shall not exceed by more than 2 percent the prime rate published from time to time by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System. Within such limitation, the regular rate of interest may be increased for new recipients of loans under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 152, § 2C/HB 1178; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 2/HB 509; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2017, p. 397, § 3/HB 427; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), inserted “, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse”, substituted “his or her health care profession” for “medicine”, inserted “or other applicable accredited health care education program”, and added “or such other applicable accreditation for other health care education programs, as determined by the board.”; in subsection (b), in the second sentence, inserted “or health care” twice; and, in subsection (c), near the middle, inserted “, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse”, and inserted “, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses”.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “this article” for “this chapter” throughout this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 197 (2006).

31-34-4.1.
Grants to hospitals and other entities; use of funds; rules and regulations authorized.

After providing priority consideration to granting loans pursuant to Code Section 31-34-4, the board is authorized to make grants to hospitals and, as determined by the board, other health care entities, local governments, and civic organizations in underserved rural areas of Georgia, provided that any such hospital, health care entity, local government, or civic organization matches such grant in an amount not less than such grant. Such grants shall be for the purpose of enhancing recruitment efforts in bringing physicians, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses to such areas.

Acceptable expenditures of grant funds by a hospital or other health care entity, local government, or civic organization include, but are not limited to, medical or health care education loan repayment, salary supplements for physicians, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses, and additional support staff for a physician’s, dentist’s, physician assistant’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s office. Grant funds shall not be used for hiring or paying a recruiting firm or individual recruiter.

The board is authorized to give priority over other grant applicants to applicant hospitals and other health care entities, local governments, and civic organizations in rural areas of this state experiencing shortages or distribution problems of certain specialties as determined by the board pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board in accordance with this article.

The board may adopt and prescribe such rules and regulations as it deems necessary or appropriate to administer and carry out the grant program provided for in this article. Such rules and regulations shall provide for the criteria that must be met by an applicant and the penalties that shall be incurred for failure to comply with the grant requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2017, p. 397, § 4/HB 427; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), deleted “physician” preceding “underserved” in the first sentence, and inserted “, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses” near the end of the second sentence; and, in the first sentence of subsection (b), inserted “or health care”, inserted “, dentists, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses”, and inserted “, dentist’s, physician assistant’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s” near the end.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “this article” for “this chapter” at the end of subsection (c) and at the end of the first sentence of subsection (d).

31-34-5.
Service cancelable loan; amount; repayment; determination of underserved rural areas.

The board shall have the authority to grant to each applicant approved by the board on a one-year renewable basis a service cancelable loan for a period not exceeding four years. The amount of the loan shall be determined by the board, but such amount shall be related to the applicant’s outstanding obligations incurred as a direct result of completing medical or health care education and training.

A loan or loans to each approved applicant shall be granted on the condition that the full amount of the loan or loans shall be repaid to the State of Georgia in services to be rendered by the applicant’s practicing his or her profession in a board approved physician, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse underserved rural area of Georgia. For each full year of practicing his or her profession in such underserved rural area, the physician, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who obtained the loan shall receive credit for the full amount of one year’s loan plus regular interest which accrued on such amount.

The board shall have the authority to make grants to each applicant hospital or other health care entity, local government, or civic organization approved by the board on a yearly basis, renewable each year at the discretion of the board. The amount of the grant shall be determined by the board, but such amount shall be related to and shall not exceed the applicant’s proposed expenditures to enhance recruitment efforts in bringing one or more physicians, dentists, physician assistants, or advanced practice registered nurses to the underserved rural area.

A grant to an approved applicant shall be made on any condition or conditions determined by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, that one or more physicians, dentists, physician assistants, or advanced practice registered nurses are employed and retained in the underserved rural area for a prescribed minimum length of time.

In making a determination of physician, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse underserved rural areas of Georgia, the board shall seek the advice and assistance of the Department of Public Health, the University of Georgia Cooperative Extension Service, the Department of Community Affairs, and such other public or private associations or organizations as the board determines to be of assistance in making such determinations. Criteria to determine physician, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse underserved rural areas shall include, but shall not be limited to, relevant statistical data related to the following:

The ratio of physicians, dentists, physician assistants, or advanced practice registered nurses to population in the area;

Indications of the health status of the population in the area;

The poverty level and dependent age groups of the population in the area;

Indications of community support for more physicians, dentists, physician assistants, or advanced practice registered nurses in the area; and

Indications that access to the physician’s, dentist’s, physician assistant’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s services is available to every person in the underserved area regardless of ability to pay.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2011, p. 459, § 3/HB 509; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2017, p. 397, § 5/HB 427.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, throughout this Code section, inserted “, dentist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse” and inserted “, dentists, physician assistants, or advanced practice registered nurses”; inserted “or health care” near the end of the last sentence of paragraph (a)(1); deleted “a physician” preceding “underserved” in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(2); deleted “physician” preceding “underserved” throughout subsection (b); and substituted “, dentist’s, physician assistant’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s” in the middle of paragraph (c)(5).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-34-6.
Contract between applicant and state agreeing to terms and conditions of loan; breach of contract; service cancelable contracts.

Before being granted a service cancelable loan provided for in this article, each applicant therefor shall enter into a contract with the State of Georgia agreeing to the terms and conditions upon which the loan is granted, which contract shall include such terms and conditions as will carry out the purposes and intent of this article. The chairperson of the board and the executive director of the board, acting for and on behalf of the State of Georgia, shall execute the contract for the board. The contract shall also be properly executed by the applicant. The board is vested with full and complete authority to bring an action in its own name against any recipient of a loan under the provisions of this article for the performance of the contract and to collect any amount that may be due under the contract.

Any recipient of a loan under the provisions of this article who breaches the contract for such loan by either failing to begin or failing to complete the rural practice service obligation under the contract shall be immediately liable to the board for twice the total uncredited amount of all loans contracted for with the recipient, such uncredited amount to be prorated on a monthly basis respecting the recipient’s actual service rendered and the total service obligation. For compelling reasons provided for in rules or regulations of the board, the board may agree to and accept a lesser measure of damages for the breach of a contract.

Before receiving a grant under this article, each approved applicant hospital or other health care entity, local government, or civic organization shall enter into a service cancelable contract with the State of Georgia agreeing to the terms and conditions upon which the grant is made, which contract shall include such terms and conditions as will carry out the purposes and intent of this article. The chairperson of the board and the executive director of the board, acting for and on behalf of the State of Georgia, shall execute the contract for the board. The contract shall also be properly executed by the applicant. The board is vested with full and complete authority to bring an action in its own name against any recipient of a grant under the provisions of this article for the performance of the contract and to collect any amount that may be due under the contract.

Any recipient of a grant under the provisions of this article who breaches the contract for such grant shall be liable for the measure of damages specified in the contract for the breach of such contract.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “this article” for “this chapter” throughout this Code section.

31-34-7.
Cancellation of contract.

The board shall have the authority to cancel the contract of any recipient of a loan under this article for cause deemed sufficient by the board, provided that such authority shall not be arbitrarily or unreasonably exercised. Upon such cancellation, the total uncredited amount paid to the recipient shall at once become due and payable to the board in cash, and interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum shall accrue on such total uncredited amount from the date of cancellation to the date of payment.

The board shall have the authority to cancel the contract of any recipient of a grant under this article for cause deemed sufficient by the board, provided that such authority shall not be arbitrarily or unreasonably exercised. Upon such cancellation, the grant recipient shall not be eligible to receive further grant funds pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “this article” for “this chapter” throughout this Code section.

31-34-8.
Funding.

The funds necessary to carry out the loan and grant program authorized by this article may come from funds made available to the board from private, federal, state, or local sources. Funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the purposes of this article shall be appropriated to the Department of Community Health for the specific purpose of the cancelable loan and grant program authorized by this article. The board shall be assigned to the Department of Community Health for administrative purposes only, except that such department shall prepare and submit the budget for that board in concurrence with that board.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 10; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “this article” for “this chapter” throughout this Code section.

31-34-9.
Biennial report to General Assembly.

The board shall make a biennial report to the General Assembly of its activities under the provisions of this article. Such report shall include the name of each recipient of a loan made under the provisions of this article, the amount of each such loan, and the rural area in which the recipient is practicing medicine. Such report shall include the name of each recipient of a grant made under the provisions of this article, the amount of each such grant, and the rural area in which the recipient is located. Such report shall also report the amount of administrative expenses incurred by the board in carrying out the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-34-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 322, § 1/HB 866; Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 6/HB 769.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “this article” for “this chapter” throughout this Code section.